Alaska, session 34, HB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 14.30.360(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) Each district in the state public school system shall be encouraged to 07 initiate and conduct a program in health education for kindergarten through grade 12. 08 The program should include instruction in physical health and personal safety 09 including alcohol and drug abuse education, [CARDIOPULMONARY 10 RESUSCITATION (CPR),] early cancer prevention and detection, dental health, 11 family health including infant care, environmental health, the identification and 12 prevention of child abuse, child abduction, neglect, sexual abuse, and domestic 13 violence, and appropriate use of health services. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 01 Sec. 14.30.363. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation education. The department 02 shall adopt curricula to instruct public school students on hands-only cardiopulmonary 03 resuscitation. The department shall determine which grade levels are required to 04 receive instruction under this section and adopt curricula that is appropriate for each of 05 those grade levels. A person holding a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation 06 instructor certificate, a license or certificate to provide emergency medical services 07 under AS 18.08.082, or a current teacher certificate issued under AS 14.20 may 08 present the curriculum to students. A public school providing instruction to students in 09 grades for which this curriculum has been adopted shall offer the instruction if 10 practicable. The curricula must be based on current national, evidence-based 11 emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for cardiopulmonary resuscitation. 12 * Sec. 3. AS 18.08.010 is amended to read: 13 Sec. 18.08.010. Administration. The department is responsible for the 14 development, implementation, and maintenance of a statewide comprehensive 15 emergency medical services system and, accordingly, shall 16 (1) coordinate public and private agencies engaged in the planning and 17 delivery of emergency medical services, including trauma care and care for major 18 emergencies, to plan an emergency medical services system; 19 (2) assist public and private agencies to deliver emergency medical 20 services, including trauma care and care for major emergencies, through the award 21 of grants in aid; 22 (3) conduct, encourage, and approve programs of education and 23 training designed to upgrade the knowledge and skills of health personnel involved in 24 emergency medical services, including trauma care and care for major emergencies; 25 (4) establish and maintain a process under which hospitals and clinics 26 could represent themselves to be trauma centers or otherwise capable of treating 27 major emergencies because they voluntarily meet criteria adopted by the department; 28 criteria adopted by the department to implement this paragraph must be based on an 29 applicable national evaluation system. 30 * Sec. 4. AS 18.08.082 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 31 (d) The commissioner may establish special designations in regulation for 01 varying levels of care for major emergencies provided by a medical facility certified 02 under (a)(3) of this section. The designations shall be based on nationally recognized 03 standards and procedures. 04 * Sec. 5. AS 18.08.200 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 05 (15) "major emergency" includes a heart attack or stroke. 06 * Sec. 6. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act take effect July 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.